Maryland, session 2025, HB1196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
23–202.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “master meter” means a meter used to measure, for
billing purposes, the total amount of water and sewer usage in a building, including the
combined use from all individually leased or owned units and all common areas.
(2) This subsection:
(I) applies only in Prince George’s County; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1196*

HOUSE BILL 1196
(II) DOES NOT APPLY TO A DUPLEX THAT IS:
1. CONSTRUCTED OR CONVERTED TO CONDOMINIUM OR
COOPERATIVE OWNERSHIP; OR
2. INTENDED TO BE CONSTRUCTED OR CONVERTED TO
CONDOMINIUM OR COOPERATIVE OWNERSHIP.
(3) The Commission may not authorize the use of a master meter for water
and sewer service in a residential multiple occupancy building that is constructed or
converted to condominium or cooperative ownership.
(4) In the case of a residential multiple occupancy building in which the
Commission has previously authorized the use of a master meter under this section, and
that is intended to be converted to condominium or cooperative ownership, the conversion
of ownership may not take effect until individual meters have been installed for each
individual dwelling unit and for the common areas of the building.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.